Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3202
License required; false representation of employment by licensee.

No person shall, in the State of Nebraska after July 1, 1959, by any direct or indirect means, engage in the private detective business, as a private detective, as a private detective agency, or as a plain clothes investigator, act or assume to act as a licensee, or represent himself to be a licensee unless such person is duly licensed and holds a valid license under the provisions of sections 71-3201 to 71-3213; and no person shall in the State of Nebraska falsely represent that he is employed by or represents a licensee.

Laws 1959, c. 329, § 2, p. 1196.